North Dakota, session 69, HB1479.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 1-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
North Dakota Constitution Day.
To commemorate the adoption of the Constitution of North Dakota on Augus t 17, 1889, by
constitutional convention, and the ratification by vote on October 1, 1889, by the people of the territory
that would become North Dakota, and to encourage state citizens to seek greater knowledge and
understanding of the Constitution of North Dakota, the first of October of each year is designated and
established as North Dakota Constitution Day.

H. B. NO. 1479 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1479.
House Vote: Yeas 88 Nays 0 Absent 6
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State